District of Columbia statutes.
41-113

Employee benefit trust distributions.

All employee benefit trust distributions and any income or other increment thereon is presumed abandoned if the owner within 3 years after it becomes payable or distributable has not accepted the distribution, corresponded in writing concerning the distribution, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the fiduciary of the trust or custodial fund or administrator of the plan under which the trust or fund is established.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 113, 27 DCR 5150
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-161, § 2(j), 39 DCR 5696
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1701(i), 44 DCR 7378

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-213.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 1701(i) of D.C. Law 12-59 substituted “3 years” for “5 years.”
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 1701(i) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 1701(i) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).